Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0805

Redemption or repurchase.

Property distributed to a member by a limited cooperative association, other than money, may be redeemed or repurchased as provided in the organic rules but a redemption or repurchase may not be made without authorization by the board of directors. The board may withhold authorization for any reason in its sole discretion. A redemption or repurchase is treated as a distribution for purposes of RCW 23.100.0806.

[ 2019 c 37 s 805.]